Illinois, session 104th, SB3189.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 15-177.1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-177.1 new)7    Sec. 15-177.1. The 30-year property homestead exemption.8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for 9taxable year 2026 and each taxable year thereafter, qualified 10homestead property that has been continuously owned, used, and 11occupied as the primary residence by a qualified taxpayer for 12at least 30 years any time prior to January 1 of the taxable 13year for which the exemption would apply is exempt from 14taxation under this Code.15    (b) Each taxpayer who has been granted an exemption under 16this Section must reapply on an annual basis. The applications 17shall be clearly marked as applications for the 30-year 18property homestead exemption. The assessor or chief county 19assessment officer shall annually give notice of the 20application period by mail or by publication. Application must 21be made during the application period in effect for the county 22in which the property is located. The assessor or chief county 23assessment officer may determine the eligibility of   SB3189- 2 -LRB104 17541 HLH 30969 b1residential property to receive the homestead exemption 2provided by this Section by application, visual inspection, 3questionnaire, or other reasonable methods, including the 4requirement for additional documentation from the applicant. 5The assessor or chief county assessment officer may enter into 6intergovernmental agreements with other governmental entities 7to establish information sharing agreements for the purpose of 8verifying applications made under this Section. The chief 9county assessment official shall conduct, by no later than 10December 31 of the first year of each reassessment cycle, as 11determined by Section 9-215 or Section 9-220, whichever 12applies, a review of all exemptions granted under this Section 13for the preceding reassessment cycle. The review shall be 14designed to ascertain whether any 30-year property homestead 15exemptions have been granted erroneously.16    (c) As used in this Section:17    "Qualified homestead property" means real property located 18in the State that has been granted an exemption under this 19Section and that, as of January 1 of the taxable year:20        (1) is residential property that is owned and occupied 21    by a qualified taxpayer as the qualified taxpayer's 22    principal residence and domicile; or23        (2) contains a single-family residence that is 24    occupied as a principal residence and domicile by a 25    qualified taxpayer who has a legal or equitable interest 26    in the property as a lessee, as evidenced by a written   SB3189- 3 -LRB104 17541 HLH 30969 b1    instrument, and on which the qualified taxpayer is liable 2    for the payment of property taxes.3        "Qualified taxpayer" means an individual who, for at 4    least 30 continuous years as of January 1 of the taxable 5    year, has occupied the same homestead property as a 6    principal residence and domicile. 7    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 8Section 8.50 as follows: 9    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)10    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 118 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 12the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 13Act of the 104th General Assembly. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.